Utah statutes.
41-3-109.   Adjudicative proceedings -- Hearings.

(1)  The commission, the division, the board, and the administrator shall comply with the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, in all adjudicative proceedings conducted under the authority of this chapter and Sections 41-1a-1001 through 41-1a-1008.

(2)  The administrator may request the attendance of the board at any hearing, or the administrator may direct that any hearing be held before the board.

